Utah statutes.
57-8-50.   Action to recover unpaid assessment.

An association of unit owners need not pursue a judicial foreclosure or nonjudicial foreclosure to collect an unpaid assessment but may file an action to recover a money judgment for the unpaid assessment without waiving the lien under Section 57-8-44.

